Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 2 Apprehension and Restraint

38-2-1007.
Apprehension.

Any person authorized by this article or Chapter 47 of Title 10 of the United States Code, or by regulations issued under either, to take persons into custody subject to this article, any marshal of a court-martial appointed pursuant to the provisions of this article, and any peace officer or civil officer having authority to take offenders into custody under the laws of the United States or of another state, may do so upon probable cause that an offense has been committed and that the person taken into custody committed it.

Commissioned officers, warrant officers, petty officers, and noncommissioned officers shall have authority to quell quarrels, frays, and disorders among persons subject to this article and to take persons into custody subject to this article who take part therein.

If an offender is taken into custody outside this state, the offender’s return to this state shall be in accordance with normal extradition procedures or by reciprocal agreement.

No person authorized by this article to take persons into custody subject to this article, or the place where such offender is confined, restrained, held, or otherwise housed, shall require payment of any fee or charge for so receiving, apprehending, confining, restraining, holding, or otherwise housing a person except as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1007

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 807

.

38-2-1008.
Reserved.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1008

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1009.
Who may order the arrest or confinement of members.

An enlisted member may be ordered into arrest or confinement by any commander in the grade of O-4 or above by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or through any other person who is subject to this article. A commander in the grade of O-4 or above may authorize commissioned officers, warrant officers, petty officers, or noncommissioned officers to order enlisted members of the commanding officer’s command, or subject to the commanding officer’s authority, into arrest or confinement.

A commissioned officer, a warrant officer, or a civilian subject to this article or to trial thereunder may be ordered into arrest or confinement only by a commanding officer in the grade of O-6 or above to whose authority the person is subject by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or by another commissioned officer. The authority to order such persons into arrest or confinement shall not be delegated.

No person may be ordered into arrest or confinement except for probable cause.

This article shall not limit the authority of persons authorized to apprehend offenders to secure the custody of an alleged offender until proper authority may be notified.

The Governor, or the adjutant general under delegation by the Governor, may by written order, or regulations issued pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter, further limit who may order the arrest or confinement of members.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1009

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 809

.

38-2-1010.
Restraint of persons charged with offenses.

Any person subject to this article who is charged with an offense under this article shall be ordered into arrest or confinement by the adjutant general, as circumstances may require. When any person subject to this article is placed in arrest or confinement prior to trial, immediate steps shall be taken to inform him or her of the specific wrong of which he or she is accused, and diligent steps shall be taken to try him or her or to dismiss the charges and release him or her.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1010

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 810

.

38-2-1011.
Confinement and imprisonment in civil jails.

Confinement and imprisonment other than in a guard house, whether prior to, during, or after trial by a military court, shall be executed in jails or correctional institutions designated by the Governor, or by the adjutant general under delegation by the Governor, for that purpose.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1011

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1012.
No confinement with enemy prisoners.

No member of the organized militia shall be placed in confinement in immediate association with enemy prisoners.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1012

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1013.
Restriction on means of punishment.

No person, while being held for trial or awaiting a verdict, shall be subjected to punishment or penalty other than arrest or confinement upon the charges pending against him or her, nor shall the arrest or confinement imposed upon such person be any more rigorous than the circumstances require to insure his or her presence and the safety of others, but he or she may be subjected to minor punishment during such period for infractions of discipline. Any person placed in confinement while being held for trial or awaiting a verdict shall be given administrative credit for such time to offset any sentence subsequently imposed.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1013

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 813

.

38-2-1014.
Delivery of offenders to civil authorities.

A person who is subject to this article and accused of an offense against civil authority shall be delivered, upon request, to the civil authority for trial or confinement.

When delivery under this article is made to any civil authority of a person undergoing sentence of a court-martial, and the delivery, if followed by conviction in a civil tribunal, interrupts the execution of the sentence of the court-martial, the offender, after having answered to the civil authorities for the offense, shall, upon the request of competent military authority, be returned to the place of original custody for the completion of his or her sentence.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1014

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 814

.